apertium-sme-smj.sme.lexc
LEXICON NYSTØ-surplc
 +N+Prop+Sur:%>  NYSTØDECL ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sur+Sg+Attr+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ # ;  ! ! it shall be used in cases like Konrad Nielsenii
 +N+Prop+Plc:%>  NYSTØDECL ;
:%> PLACELASH ;

LEXICON NYSTØ-LOAN-plc ! Place names
 +N+Prop+Plc:%>  NYSTØDECL-LOAN ;
 +Use/Sub:%> PLACELASH ; !

LEXICON NYSTØ-plc ! Place names
 +N+Prop+Plc:%>  NYSTØDECL ;
:%> PLACELASH ;

LEXICON NYSTØ ! Vowel-final, heavy syll
 +N+Prop:%> NYSTØDECL ;
 
LEXICON NYSTØ-LOAN ! Vowel-final, heavy syll
 +N+Prop:%> NYSTØDECL-LOAN ;


LEXICON NYSTØDECL
 @U.Cap.Obl@ NYSTØ-OBL ;
! @U.Cap.Opt@ NYSTØ-DC ; !moved up to -plc

LEXICON NYSTØDECL-LOAN
 @U.Cap.Obl@ NYSTØ-OBL-LOAN ;
! @U.Cap.Opt@ NYSTØ-DC ; !moved up to -plc

LEXICON NYSTØ-OBL
 +Sg+Nom: K ;
 +Sg+Nom: Rreal ;
 +Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:%:s K ; ! Ny^stø:s
 +Sg+Gen+Use/Sub+Use/Circ:a   Rreal ; ! ! for placenames !
 +Sg+Gen-+Use/Sub+Use/Circ:a- Rreal ; ! ! for placenames !
 +Sg+Gen-+Use/Sub+Use/Circ:-  Rreal ; ! ! for placenames !
 +Sg+Gen+Use/Sub+Use/Circ:    Rreal ; ! ! for placenames !
 NYOBL ;
 +Use/Sub:%: NYOBL ; ! to NYOBL, optional delimiter marks. sub?
 +Use/Sub:%- NYOBL ; !
 +Use/Sub:'7 NYOBL ; !

!LEXICON NYSTØ-DC						!moved up to -plc

LEXICON NYSTØ-OBL-LOAN
 +Sg+Nom: K ;
 +Sg+Nom: Rreal ;
 +Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:%:s K ; ! Ny^stø:s
 +Sg+Gen+Use/Sub+Use/Circ:a   Rreal ; ! ! for placenames !
 +Sg+Gen-+Use/Sub+Use/Circ:a- Rreal ; ! ! for placenames !
 +Sg+Gen-+Use/Sub+Use/Circ:-  Rreal ; ! ! for placenames !
 +Sg+Gen+Use/Sub+Use/Circ:    Rreal ; ! ! for placenames !
 +Use/Sub: NYOBL ; !
 +Use/Sub:%: NYOBL ; ! to NYOBL, optional delimiter marks. sub?
 +Use/Sub:%- NYOBL ; !
 +Use/Sub:'7 NYOBL ; !

LEXICON NYOBL
 +Sg+Gen: K ;
 +Sg+Acc: K ;
 +Sg+Ill:j K ;
 +Sg+Loc:s K ;
 +Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Sg+Com:jn K ;
 +Ess:n K ;
 +Pl+Nom:t K ;
 +Pl+Gen:jd K ;
 +Pl+Acc:jd K ;
 +Pl+Ill:jde K ;
 +Pl+Loc:jn K ;
 +Pl+Com:jgujn K ;
 +Sg+Gen+Use/Sub:a K ; !
 +Sg+Acc+Use/Sub:a K ; !
 +Sg+Ill+Use/Sub:aj K ; !
 +Sg+Ill+Use/Sub:ij K ; !
 +Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:as K ; !
 +Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:an K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Sg+Com+Use/Sub:ajn K ; !
 +Ess+Use/Sub:an K ; !
 +Pl+Nom+Use/Sub:at K ; !
 +Pl+Gen+Use/Sub:ajd K ; !
 +Pl+Acc+Use/Sub:ajd K ; !
 +Pl+Ill+Use/Sub:ajde K ; !
 +Pl+Loc+Use/Sub:ajn K ; !
 +Pl+Com+Use/Sub:ajgujn K ; !

! Consonant-final names
! - - - - - - - - - - -
! These CNAME lexica are not longer used, shall be removed
!LEXICON CNAME ! Cns final, not yet specified
! @U.Cap.Obl@ CNAME-UCASE ;
! @U.Cap.Opt@ CNAME-DC ;

!LEXICON CNAME-UCASE
! +N+Prop+Sg+Nom: K ;
! +N+Prop+Sg+Attr:%> K ; !SUB
! +N+Prop+Sg+Nom:# Rreal ; ! for place names
! +N+Prop+Sg+Loc:%:s K ; ! Ty^dal:s  !SUB
!     CNAME-OBL ;
! :%: CNAME-OBL ;	 !SUB
! :%- CNAME-OBL ;	 !SUB
! :%: CNAME-SUBSTANDARD ; !SUB
! :%- CNAME-SUBSTANDARD ; !SUB

!LEXICON CNAME-DC						!moved up to -plc
! +N+Prop+Der/laš:alažž DEARVVASLAS ;		!SUB

!LEXICON CNAME-OBL
! +N+Prop+Sg+Gen:a K ;
! +N+Prop+Sg+Gen:a Rreal ; ! for place names
! +N+Prop+Sg+Acc:a K ;
! +N+Prop+Sg+Ill:ij K ;
! +N+Prop+Sg+Loc+isuf:is K ;
! +N+Prop+Sg+Com+isuf:ijn K ;
! +N+Prop+Ess+isuf:in K ;
! +N+Prop+Sg+Loc+asuf:as K ;
! +N+Prop+Sg+Com+asuf:ajn K ;
! +N+Prop+Ess+asuf:an K ;
! +N+Prop+Pl+Nom:at K ;
! +N+Prop+Pl+Gen:ijd K ;
! +N+Prop+Pl+Acc:ijd K ;
! +N+Prop+Pl+Ill:ijdda K ;
! +N+Prop+Pl+Loc:ijn K ;
! +N+Prop+Pl+Com:ijgujn K ;

LEXICON LONDON-SUBSTANDARD !SUB
 +Sg+Ill+Use/Sub:i K ; !
 ! This is for "Statskog:i"

!These not yet in use.
!LEXICON PLACE-DIM-obj
! +N+Prop+Obj:%> PLACE-DIMDECL ;
!
!LEXICON PLACE-DIM-org
! +N+Prop+Org:%> PLACE-DIMDECL ;

!LEXICON PLACE-DIM-mal
! +N+Prop+Mal:%>  PLACE-DIMDECL ;

!LEXICON PLACE-DIM-fem
! +N+Prop+Fem:%>  PLACE-DIMDECL ;
!
LEXICON PLACE-DIM-sur
 +N+Prop+Sur:%> PLACE-DIMDECL ;
!
LEXICON PLACE-DIM-plc
 +N+Prop+Plc:%> PLACE-DIMDECL ;
:%> PLACELASH ;

LEXICON PLACE-DIM-ani
 +N+Prop+Ani:%> PLACE-DIMDECL ;


!LEXICON PLACE-DIM
! +Der/š+Der/Dimin:%> PLACE-DIMDECL ;
!
LEXICON PLACE-DIMDECL
 @U.Cap.Obl@ PLACE-DIM-OBL ;
! @U.Cap.Opt@ PLACE-DIM-DC ;

LEXICON PLACE-DIM-OBL
 +Sg+Nom: K ;
 +Sg+Nom+Use/Sub:X7 Rreal ; !
 +Sg+Nom: Rreal ;
 +Sg+Nom-+Use/Sub:X7- Rreal ; !
 +Sg+Nom-+Use/Sub:- Rreal ; !
 +Ess:in K ;
 +Sg+Gen:a K ;
 +Sg+Gen+Use/Sub: K ; !
 +Sg+Gen:a Rreal ; !compound also for these
 +Sg+Gen: Rreal ;  !compound also for these
 +Sg+Gen-+Use/Sub:a- Rreal ; ! !compound also for these
 +Sg+Gen-+Use/Sub:- Rreal ;  ! !compound also for these
 +Sg+Acc:a K ;
 +Sg+Acc+Use/Sub: K ; !
 +Pl+Nom:at K ;
 :i PLACE-DIM-i ;

LEXICON PLACE-DIM-i
 +Sg+Ill:j K ;
 +Sg+Loc:s K ;
 +Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Sg+Com:jn K ;
 +Pl+Gen:jd K ;
 +Pl+Gen:jd Rreal ;
 +Pl+Acc:jd K ;
 +Pl+Ill:jdda K ;
 +Pl+Loc:jn K ;
 +Pl+Com:jgujn K ;

LEXICON PLACE-DIMV !DIMINV for propernouns
 +Sg+Nom: K ;
 +Sg+Nom: Rreal ;                    !Test this
 +Sg+Nom-+Use/Sub:- Rreal ; !
 +Sg+Acc:aX4 K ;
 +Sg+Gen:aX4 K ;
 +Sg+Gen:aX4 Rreal ;
 +Sg+Gen-+Use/Sub:aX4- Rreal ; !
 +Sg+Ill:aX3j K ;
 +Sg+Loc:aX4s K ;
 +Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:aX4n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Sg+Com:aX5jn K ;
 +Pl+Nom:aX4t K ;
 +Pl+Gen:aX5jd K ;
 +Pl+Acc:aX5jd K ;
 +Pl+Ill:aX5jde K ;
 +Pl+Loc:aX5jn K ;
 +Pl+Com:aX5jgujn K ;
 +Ess:an K ;

LEXICON C-FI-NEN-sur
! For Finnish surnames. Itkonen.
 +N+Prop+Sur:%> C-FI-NENDECL ;

LEXICON C-FI-NEN-plc
! For Finnish placenames with ending -nen. Kaustinen.
 +N+Prop+Plc:%> C-FI-NENDECL ;
 NENPLACELASH ;



LEXICON C-FI-NEN-surplc
! For Finnish names with ending -nen that are used both surnames and placenames. Huittinen.
 +N+Prop+Sur:%> C-FI-NENDECL ;
 NENPLACELASH ;






! Finnish Itkonen, lexicon for Finnish nen-names

LEXICON C-FI-NEN
 +N+Prop:%> C-FI-NENDECL ;

LEXICON C-FI-NENDECL  ! Finnish names
 :s FI-S ;            ! In Fin^land, they are declined with
                      ! Itkosa as the oblique stem.
 :nen9 LONDONDECL ;   ! In Norway, they are declined as CNAME
                      ! with ordinary genitive Itkonena

! Finnish Itkosa
LEXICON FI-S
 @U.Cap.Obl@ FI-S-OBL ;
! @U.Cap.Opt@ FI-S-DC ; !moved up to -plc

LEXICON FI-S-OBL
 +Sg+Gen+Use/Sub:   Rreal ; ! For names
 +Sg+Gen-:- Rreal ; !    For names
 +Sg+Gen:a K ;
 +Sg+Acc:a K ;
 +Sg+Ill:ij K ;
 +Sg+Loc:is K ;
 +Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:in K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Sg+Com:ijn K ;
 +Ess:in K ;
 +Pl+Nom:at K ;
 +Pl+Gen:ijd K ;
 +Pl+Acc:ijd K ;
 +Pl+Ill:ijdda K ;
 +Pl+Loc:ijn K ;
 +Pl+Com:ijgujn K ;

!LEXICON FI-S-DC						!moved up to -plc
! +Der/laš:lažž DEARVVASLAS ;

LEXICON LONDON-atr		!SUB
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Attr+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ # ; !

LEXICON LONDON-sur ! Final foot structure (X.) and (X..) => Loc:is
! Different lexicon for personal surnames.
 +N+Prop+Sur:%> LONDONDECL ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sur+Sg+Attr+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ # ;  ! ! it shall be used in cases like Konrad Nielsenii

LEXICON LONDON-ani
 +N+Prop+Ani:%> LONDONDECL ;

LEXICON LONDON-org
 +N+Prop+Org:%> LONDONDECL ;

LEXICON LONDON-LOAN-org
 +N+Prop+Org:%> LONDONDECL-LOAN ;

LEXICON LONDON-orgsur
 +N+Prop+Org:%> LONDONDECL ;
 +N+Prop+Sur:%> LONDONDECL ;

LEXICON LONDON-mal
 +N+Prop+Mal:%> LONDONDECL ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Mal+Sg+Attr+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ # ;  ! ! it shall be used in cases like Konrad Nielsenii

LEXICON LONDON-malplc
 +N+Prop+Plc:%> LONDONDECL ;
 +N+Prop+Mal:%> LONDONDECL ;
:%> PLACELASH ;

LEXICON LONDON-malsur
 +N+Prop+Mal:%> LONDONDECL ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Mal+Sg+Attr+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ # ;  ! ! it shall be used in cases like Konrad Nielsenii
 +N+Prop+Sur:%> LONDONDECL ;

LEXICON LONDON-fem
 +N+Prop+Fem:%> LONDONDECL ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Fem+Sg+Attr+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ # ;  ! ! it shall be used in cases like Konrad Nielsenii

LEXICON LONDON-malfem
 +N+Prop+Fem:%> LONDONDECL ;
 +N+Prop+Mal:%> LONDONDECL ;

LEXICON LONDON-LOAN-plc
 +N+Prop+Plc:%> LONDONDECL-LOAN ;
 +Use/Sub:%> PLACELASH ; !

LEXICON LONDON-plc
 +N+Prop+Plc:%> LONDONDECL ;
:%> PLACELASH ;


LEXICON LONDON-surplc
 +N+Prop+Plc:%> LONDONDECL ;
 +N+Prop+Sur:%> LONDONDECL ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sur+Sg+Attr+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ # ;  ! ! it shall be used in cases like Konrad Nielsenii
:%> PLACELASH ;


LEXICON LONDON-obj
 +N+Prop+Obj:%> LONDONDECL ;

LEXICON ProperNoun
 Ai+Use/Sub:Ai NYSTØ-surplc ; !
Ann-Iren:Ann-Iren9 LONDON-fem ;
Arcturus LONDON-malsur ;
As^bjørn:As^bjørn9 LONDON-mal ;
Badderen:Badderen9 LONDON-LOAN-plc ;
Berg^verk^lov^komiteen:Berg^verk^lov^komiteen9 LONDON-org ;
Birgit LONDON-fem ;
Bislett LONDON-plc ;
Bjølsen:Bjølsen9 LONDON-sur ;
 Bloms^øy+Use/Sub:Bloms^øy NYSTØ-plc ; !
Bøver^bru NYSTØ ;
 Britisk+Use/Sub:Britisk9 LONDON-atr ;	!
Dadafon:Dadafon9 LONDON-org ;
Direktoratet:Direktoratet LONDON-LOAN-org ;
Divttas^vuon^a-Hellemo:Divttas^vuon^a-Hellemo9 NYSTØ-LOAN ;
Dundas LONDON-plc ;
Edom:Edom9 LONDON-sur ;
Eien^domms^retten:Eien^domms^retten9 LONDON-obj ;
Eirik LONDON-mal ;
Eirin:Eirin9 LONDON-fem ;
Eiter^å NYSTØ-plc ;
Enoš LONDON-malsur ;
Fenris LONDON-ani ;
Fenris^ulven:Fenris^ulven9 LONDON-ani ;
Fin^lands^ve^ien:Fin^lands^ve^ien9 LONDON-LOAN-plc ;
Flad^mo:Flad^mo9 NYSTØ ;
Foiniks LONDON-ani ;
Folke^tællingen:Folke^tællingen9 LONDON-obj ;
Føniks LONDON-ani ;
Games LONDON-org ;
Germanicus LONDON-malsur ;
Gjirokastër LONDON-plc ;
Gørbitz:Gørbitz9 LONDON-sur ;
Gran^ly NYSTØ-surplc ;
Gran^ö NYSTØ-plc ;
Gunnvor LONDON-fem ;
Gustav LONDON-mal ;
 Hahpahan^jogaš:Hahpahan^jogaž PLACE-DIM-plc ; !FIN
 Historisk+Use/Sub:Historisk9 LONDON-atr ;	!
Hånd^skrift^samlingen:Hånd^skrift^samlingen9 LONDON-obj ;
 Haraway+Use/Sub:Haraway NYSTØ; !
Haug^sjå NYSTØ-plc ;
Homer LONDON-sur ;
Ikon:Ikon9 LONDON-ani ;
Ilios LONDON-surplc ;
Isfahan:Isfahan9 LONDON-plc ;
Is^havet:Is^havet LONDON-LOAN-plc ;
Jairos LONDON-mal ;
Jakov LONDON-surplc ;
 Jarveläinen+Use/Sub:Jarveläi C-FI-NEN-sur ; !
Jergol LONDON-malplc ;
Jord^bruks^departementet:Jord^bruks^departementet LONDON-LOAN-org ;
Kana^by NYSTØ ;
Kempas LONDON-obj ;
Kinos LONDON-surplc ;
Kjellaug:Kjellaug9 LONDON-fem ;
Konge^riget:Konge^riget LONDON-LOAN-org ;
Kvæven:Kvæven9 LONDON-surplc ;
Lågen:Lågen9 LONDON-plc ;
Lant^mäteri^et:Lant^mäteri^et LONDON-org ;
 Lappisk+Use/Sub:Lappisk9 LONDON-atr ;	!
Laptev^havet LONDON-LOAN-plc ;
Laurits LONDON-mal ;
Lebes^by NYSTØ-LOAN-plc ;
Lemesós LONDON-malsur ;
Lia^bø NYSTØ ;
Like^stillings^senter LONDON-obj ;
 Lokal^historisk+Use/Sub:Lokal^historisk9 LONDON-atr ;	!
Lomé NYSTØ-plc ;
Mal^å NYSTØ-LOAN-plc ;
Marques LONDON-sur ;
Martinus LONDON-malsur ;
Michel LONDON-fem ;
Middel^havet LONDON-LOAN-plc ;
Mid^gards^ormen:Mid^gards^ormen9 LONDON-ani ;
Morales LONDON-surplc ;
Mulhacén:Mulhacén9 LONDON-plc ;
Nær^ø NYSTØ ;
Nepal LONDON-surplc ;
Nerevs LONDON-mal ;
Nesse^by NYSTØ-LOAN-plc ;
Occidental LONDON-org ;
Oke^anos LONDON-surplc ;
Opp^gave^registeret LONDON-obj ;
Opp^lærings^avdelingen:Opp^lærings^avdelingen9 LONDON-LOAN-org ;
Øst^havet:Øst^havet LONDON-LOAN-plc ;
 Pohjas^jeakke^jogaš:Pohjas^jeakke^jogaž PLACE-DIM-plc ; !FIN
Rennebu NYSTØ ;
Rieser LONDON-orgsur ;
 Roavve^aláš:Roavve^aláž PLACE-DIM-plc ; !FIN
Robin:Robin9 LONDON-malfem ;
 Russisk+Use/Sub:Russisk9 LONDON-atr ;	!
Same^tinget:Same^tinget9 LONDON-LOAN-org ;
Schjøtt-Pedersen:Schjøtt-Pedersen9 LONDON-sur ;
 Selis^njárg^aláš+Use/Sub:Selis^njárg^aláž PLACE-DIM-plc ; !
Senter LONDON-org ;
Skauen:Skauen9 LONDON-plc ;
Skjerv^ø NYSTØ-LOAN-plc ;
 Skjerv^øy+Use/Sub:Skjerv^øy NYSTØ-plc ; !
Skov^ly NYSTØ-surplc ;
Skul^stad^mo:Skul^stad^mo9 NYSTØ ;
Sör^kaitum:Sör^kaitum9 LONDON-LOAN-plc ;
 Statens% heimeyrkeskole% for% samer+Use/Sub:Statens% heimeyrkeskole% for% samer LONDON-LOAN-org; !
 Stuorra^skái^aláš:Stuorra^skái^aláž PLACE-DIM-plc ; !FIN
Survival:Survival LONDON-obj ;
Svarten:Svarten9 LONDON-ani ;
Taipalus LONDON-malsur ;
Tärna^by NYSTØ-LOAN-plc ;
Teig^mo:Teig^mo9 NYSTØ-surplc ;
Tomas LONDON-mal ;
 Topo^graphisk+Use/Sub:Topo^graphisk9 LONDON-atr ;	!
 Topo^graphisk-Statitistisk+Use/Sub:Topo^graphisk-Statitistisk9 LONDON-atr ;	!
Torill LONDON-fem ;
Troms^ø NYSTØ-LOAN-plc ;
 Unna^čearoš+Use/Sub:Unna^čearož PLACE-DIM-plc ; !
 Unna^váráš:Unna^váráž PLACE-DIM-plc ; !FIN
Urbanus LONDON-malsur ;
Ut^lendings^direktoratet LONDON-LOAN-org ;
Vads^ø NYSTØ-LOAN-plc ;
Vard^ø NYSTØ-LOAN-plc ;
Vest^ly NYSTØ-surplc ;
Vi^by NYSTØ-plc ;
Vidde^laget LONDON-org ;
Wi^lander LONDON-sur ;
